Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1109
Submission of plan to voters; notice; publication; contents.

When a merger plan is submitted to the voters for approval pursuant to section 16-1108, the city council of each city adopting the plan shall publish a notice at least once each week for three consecutive weeks prior to the election in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the city. Final publication in each city shall be within seven calendar days prior to the election pursuant to section 16-1110. The notice shall describe the contents of the plan and specify that a copy of the plan may be obtained at no charge at the city clerk's office.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 9.